Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-809
Historic structure; defined.

For purposes of sections 72-808 to 72-810, historic structure shall mean any building significant in American history or architecture on a local, state, or national level.

Laws 1986, LB 563, § 2.